California, session 20252026, AB933.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2656.5 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:2656.5. Notwithstanding any other law or practice to the contrary, any individual who is deemed disabled on the basis of any illness or injury resulting from pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical condition and is determined to be eligible to receive disability benefits pursuant to this part for those purposes shall be eligible to receive those disability benefits for a period of no less than 12 weeks following childbirth.SECTION 1.Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.(a)“Organized residential camp” means a site with program and facilities established for the primary purposes of providing an outdoor group living experience with social, spiritual, educational, or recreational objectives, for five days or more during one or more seasons of the year.(b)The term “organized residential camp” does not include a motel, tourist camp, trailer park, resort, hunting camp, auto court, labor camp, penal or correctional camp and does not include a child care institution or home-finding agency.(c)The term “organized residential camp” also does not include any charitable or recreational organization that complies with the rules and regulations for recreational trailer parks.(d)“Organized day camp” means a site where the primary purpose is to provide a group experience with social, spiritual, educational, or recreational objectives, that has programs and facilities attended by five or more children 3 to 17 years of age, inclusive, and that operates for more than three hours per day for at least five days during any 12-month period.(e)“Living experience” means an overnight camp for five days or more.SEC. 2.Section 18897.1 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.1.“Camper” means any person in an organized residential camp or an organized day camp on a fee or nonfee basis who is a participant in the regular program and training of an organized residential camp or an organized day camp, and who may take on duties relating to that program and training.SEC. 3.Section 18897.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.2.(a)Except as provided in Section 18930, the State Public Health Officer shall adopt, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, rules and regulations establishing minimum standards for organized residential camps and regulating the operation of organized residential camps that the State Public Health Officer determines are necessary to protect the health and safety of the campers. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall also apply to organized day camps, except for those regulations that are applicable to a living experience. Organized residential camps and organized day camps, when applicable, also shall comply with the building standards of the jurisdiction in which the camp is located, to the extent that those standards are not contrary to, or inconsistent with, the building standards adopted by the State Public Health Officer. The State Public Health Officer shall adopt and submit building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 for the purposes described in this section. The State Department of Public Health shall enforce building standards published in the State Building Standards Code relating to organized residential camps and organized day camps, as applicable, and other rules and regulations adopted by the State Public Health Officer pursuant to the provisions of this section as the State Public Health Officer determines are necessary to protect the health and safety of campers. In adopting building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 and in adopting other rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of this section, the State Public Health Officer shall consider the Camp Standards of the American Camping Association.(b)The State Public Health Officer shall adopt and submit building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 and shall adopt other rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of this section establishing minimum standards for intermittent short-term organized residential camps operated by a city or a county as the State Public Health Officer deems necessary to protect the health and safety of campers. For purposes of this subdivision, “intermittent short-term organized residential camp” means a site for camping by any group of people for a period of not more than 72 consecutive hours for that group.SEC. 4.Section 18897.3 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.3.Except as provided in Section 18930, the State Fire Marshal shall adopt minimum fire safety regulations for organized residential camps in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and submit building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 of this division for the purposes described in this section. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall also apply to organized day camps, except for those regulations that are applicable to a living experience.SEC. 5.Section 18897.4 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.4.Every local health officer shall enforce within their jurisdiction the building standards published in the State Building Standards Code relating to organized residential camps and organized day camps, except, for organized day camps, those regulations that are applicable to a living experience, and the other rules and regulations adopted by the State Public Health Officer pursuant to Section 18897.2.SEC. 6.Section 18897.6 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.6.Organized residential camps and organized day camps shall not be subject to regulation by any state agency other than the State Department of Public Health, California regional water quality control boards, the State Water Resources Control Board, and the State Fire Marshal; provided, that this section shall not affect the authority of the Department of Industrial Relations to regulate the wages or hours of employees of organized residential camps or organized day camps and this section shall not be construed to limit the application of building standards published in the State Building Standards Code to structures in organized residential camps and organized day camps.SEC. 7.Section 18897.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18897.7.No organized residential camp or organized day camp shall be operated in this state unless each site or location in which the camp operates satisfies the minimum standards for organized residential camps or organized day camps, when applicable, prescribed in building standards published in the State Building Standards Code relating to organized residential camps and organized day camps, and in other rules and regulations adopted by the State Public Health Officer and the State Fire Marshal. Any violation of this section or of any building standard published in the State Building Standards Code relating to organized residential camps or organized day camps, as applicable, or any other rule or regulation adopted pursuant to Section 18897.2 or 18897.3 in the operation of organized residential camps or organized day camps, as applicable, is a misdemeanor.SEC. 8.Section 18897.8 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:18897.8.The provisions of this part pertaining to organized day camps shall become inoperative after the Department of Social Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the report required in Sections 1796.90 and 1796.91.SEC. 9.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.